Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-819
Authority; members; expenses.

The members
of the authority shall receive no compensation for the performance of their
duties as members, but each such member shall be paid his or her actual and
necessary expenses while engaged in the performance of such duties as provided
in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 from any funds legally available therefor.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2916;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1716;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 19.